New York, session 2025-2026, S6391.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public authorities law is amended by adding a new 2 section 1885 to read as follows: 3 § 1885. Geothermal energy systems. 1. The authority, in consultation 4 with appropriate industries, shall develop basic consumer education or 5 guidance about geothermal energy systems and shall develop business 6 models for geothermal projects in the state to match equivalent program- 7 ming and guidance for solar energy. 8 2. As used in this section, the term "geothermal energy system" shall 9 mean a system that uses geothermal energy for water heating or space 10 heating or cooling in a single building, for space heating for more than 11 one building through a pipeline network, or for electricity generation. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10921-01-5